Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.240

Streets over tidelands—Control of.

All streets declared public highways under the provisions of RCW 35.21.230 shall be under the control of the corporate authorities of the respective cities.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.240. Prior: 1890 p 733 s 2; RRS s 9294.]